Utah statutes.
57-2a-6.   Form of certificate.

The form of a certificate of acknowledgment used by a person whose authority is recognized under Section 57-2a-3 shall be accepted if:

(1)  the certificate is in a form prescribed by the laws or rules of this state;

(2)  the certificate is in a form prescribed by the laws or regulations applicable in the place where the acknowledgment is taken; or

(3)  the certificate contains the words "acknowledged before me," or their substantial equivalent.

